California, session 20252026, AB2443.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 2878) is added to Chapter 10 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code, to read: Article 1.5. Carriers of Last Resort2878. (a) The commission shall develop a reasonable process for a carrier of last resort to be relieved, on or before January 1, 2029, of that status in areas where customers have other options for voice service.(b) For purposes of this section, “carrier of last resort” has the same meaning as defined in Section 275.6.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.